District of Columbia statutes.
31-3931.21

Regulations.

The Commissioner may issue rules and regulations relating to captive insurers as are necessary to enable him or her to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 22, 52 DCR 1205
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 22 of Captive Insurance Company Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-640, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1238).
This section is referenced in § 31-3931.06, § 31-3931.22, and § 31-3932.03.